Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,113
Contribution to Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact Commission's budget; how paid.

The state's annual contribution to the Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact Commission's budget shall be paid by generators of low-level radioactive waste in this state which dispose of such waste in low-level radioactive waste disposal facilities through fees assessed by the department pursuant to section 81-15,104. Fees may be reasonably assessed on the basis of volume of the waste shipped and shall be deposited in the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Cash Fund. Such fees shall be due the first of July beginning in 1986 and shall continue until surcharges are collected pursuant to Article IV, section (h)(2), of the compact. There shall be no General Fund appropriation for the construction, maintenance, or long-term monitoring and care of a facility.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 36;

Laws 1987, LB 426, § 18.

Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact, see section 71-3522.